Idaho, session 2026, H0961.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-602G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-602G. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM TAXATION -- HOMESTEAD. (1) For each tax
year, the first one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) of the
market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined
in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or fifty percent (50%) one hundred percent
(100%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that
term is defined in section 63-701, Idaho Code, whichever is the lesser, shall
be exempt from property taxation.
(2) The exemption allowed by this section may be granted only if:
(a) The homestead is owner-occupied and used as the primary dwelling
place of the owner. The homestead may consist of part of a multidwelling
or multipurpose building and shall include all of such dwelling or
building except any portion used exclusively for anything other than
the primary dwelling of the owner. The presence of an office in a home-
stead, which office is used for multiple purposes, including business
and personal use, shall not prevent the owner from claiming the exemp-
tion provided in this section; and
(b) The state tax commission has certified to the board of county com-
missioners that all properties in the county subject to appraisal by the
county assessor have, in fact, been appraised uniformly so as to secure
a just valuation for all property within the county; and
(c) The owner has certified to the county assessor that:
(i) He is making application for the exemption allowed by this
section;
(ii) The homestead is his primary dwelling place; and


(iii) He has not made application in any other county for the ex-
emption and has not made application for the exemption on any other
homestead in the county.
(d) For the purpose of this section, the definition of "owner" shall be
the same definition set forth in section 63-701(7), Idaho Code. When an
owner, pursuant to the provisions of section 63-701(7), Idaho Code, is
any person who is the beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust,
or who is a partner of a limited partnership, a member of a limited lia-
bility company, or a shareholder of a corporation, he or she may provide
proof of the trust, limited partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation in the manner set forth in section 63-703(4), Idaho Code.
(e) Any owner may request in writing the return of all copies of any
documents submitted with the affidavit set forth in section 63-703(4),
Idaho Code, that are held by a county assessor, and the copies shall
be returned by the county assessor upon submission of the affidavit in
proper form.
(f) For the purpose of this section, the definition of "primary
dwelling place" shall be the same definition set forth in section
63-701(8), Idaho Code.
(g) For the purpose of this section, the definition of "occupied" shall
be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(6), Idaho Code.
(3) The county assessor of each county shall prescribe and make avail-
able forms to be used by a homeowner to apply for the homestead exemption pro-
vided in this section. The homeowner shall provide on such forms the home-
owner's full name, date of birth, complete address, and most recent previ-
ous complete address. The homeowner shall also provide, as applicable, such
homeowner's Idaho state-issued driver's license number or Idaho state-is-
sued identification card number, except that such requirement shall not ap-
ply to a homeowner in active military service for the initial application for
the exemption and during such time as the homeowner meets the qualifications
provided in subsection (8) of this section. If the homeowner applying for
the exemption provided in this section has not been domiciled in Idaho for
at least ninety (90) days and does not have an Idaho state-issued driver's
license or Idaho state-issued identification card, the homeowner shall pro-
vide an Idaho state-issued driver's license number or an Idaho state-issued
identification card number to the county assessor within ninety (90) days of
submitting such homeowner's initial application for the exemption.
(4) An owner need make application for the exemption described in sub-
section (1) of this section only once, as long as all of the following condi-
tions are met:
(a) The owner has received the exemption during the previous year as a
result of making a valid application as set forth in subsection (2)(c)
of this section.
(b) The owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appro-
priate, still occupies the same homestead for which the owner made ap-
plication.
(c) The homestead described in paragraph (b) of this subsection is
owner-occupied or occupied by a beneficiary, partner, member or share-
holder, as appropriate, and used as the primary dwelling place of the
owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate.


(5)(a) The exemption allowed by this section shall be effective on the
date of eligibility status change provided on the approved application
for the current tax year and must be taken before the reduction in taxes
provided by sections 63-701 through 63-710, Idaho Code, is applied.
(b) If the eligibility status of the property eligible for the exemp-
tion changes during the tax year, the property taxes shall be prorated
based on the property's eligibility status during the year. The levy
rate shall be multiplied against the market value for assessment pur-
poses of the property, and the resulting tax due shall be divided by
three hundred sixty-five (365) days, or by three hundred sixty-six
(366) days if the tax year is a leap year, for the daily tax amount and
then multiplied by the number of days of the year such property has a
given exemption eligibility status. For an owner who qualifies for the
homeowner exemption, the property taxes shall be calculated using the
market value for assessment purposes, reduced by the exemption amount
provided in subsection (1) of this section. The levy rate shall be
multiplied against such value and divided by three hundred sixty-five
(365) days, or by three hundred sixty-six (366) days if the tax year is
a leap year, and then multiplied by the number of days such person is
eligible for the exemption.
(c) If the eligibility status of the property changes during the tax
year, the taxable value of the homestead or the tax amount shall be ad-
justed in one (1) of the following ways:
(i) If the property becomes eligible before the second Monday of
July, the reduced taxable value shall be entered on the property
roll pursuant to section 63-301, Idaho Code, and the homeowner
property tax relief roll pursuant to section 63-724(4), Idaho
Code;
(ii) If the property becomes eligible on or after the second Mon-
day of July, property taxes due shall be calculated as provided
in paragraph (b) of this subsection and any reduction in property
tax will result in a cancellation or refund as provided in section
63-1202, Idaho Code;
(iii) If the property becomes ineligible for the exemption before
the second Monday of July, any additional taxable value shall be
entered on the property roll pursuant to section 63-301, Idaho
Code, and the homeowner property tax relief roll pursuant to sec-
tion 63-724(4), Idaho Code;
(iv) If the property becomes ineligible for the exemption on or
after the second Monday of July but no later than the fourth Monday
of November, the additional value shall be assessed and entered on
the subsequent or missed property roll pursuant to the provisions
of section 63-301, Idaho Code; or
(v) If the property becomes ineligible for the exemption on or af-
ter the fourth Monday of November, the tax on the additional value
may be calculated as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection
and billed as provided for the recovery of the property tax exemp-
tion pursuant to this subsection.
(6) Recovery of property tax exemptions allowed by this section but im-
properly claimed or approved:


(a)(i) Prior to granting an exemption, the county assessor shall
investigate whether an applicant for the exemption has claimed the
exemption for another homestead and shall not grant the exemption
where it appears the exemption has been improperly claimed. The
applicant shall be notified of the county assessor's refusal to
grant the exemption.
(ii) Upon discovery of evidence, facts or circumstances indicat-
ing any exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed
or approved, the county assessor shall decide whether the exemp-
tion claimed should have been allowed and, if not, notify the tax-
payer in writing, assess a recovery of property tax and notify the
county treasurer of this assessment. If the county assessor de-
termined that an exemption was improperly approved as a result of
county error, the county assessor shall present the discovered ev-
idence, facts or circumstances from the improperly approved ex-
emption to the board of county commissioners, at which time the
board may waive a recovery of the property tax and notify such tax-
payer in writing.
(iii) Upon the first instance of a taxpayer being discovered to
have claimed more than one (1) homestead exemption, the taxpayer
shall be subject to a penalty, payable to the county treasurer, in
an amount equal to the amount of property tax recovered pursuant
to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, which shall be paid in ad-
dition to such recovery amount. The taxpayer shall be notified of
the assessment of such penalty at the same time as the notice of the
assessor's refusal to grant the exemption in subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph.
(iv) Any subsequent violation within seven (7) years of an in-
stance pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph shall be a
misdemeanor, subject to the penalties provided in section 18-113,
Idaho Code. The county assessor shall notify the county prosecut-
ing attorney of any conduct that would constitute a misdemeanor
pursuant to this subparagraph.
(v) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a taxpayer from
claiming a homestead exemption after January 1 for a property that
is not already subject to the homestead exemption, provided any
claim for an exemption is consistent with the requirements of sub-
section (2)(c)(iii) of this section.
(b) Upon request by a county assessor conducting an investigation under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, or when information indicating that
an improper claim for the exemption allowed by this section is discov-
ered by the state tax commission, the state tax commission shall dis-
close relevant information to the appropriate county assessor, board
of county commissioners, county clerk, and county treasurer and to the
secretary of state. Information disclosed to county officials and the
secretary of state by the state tax commission under this subsection:
(i) May be used to decide the validity of any entitlement to the
exemption provided in this section;
(ii) Shall, as necessary, be used to determine a person's resi-
dence for voting purposes under title 34, Idaho Code; and


(iii) Is not otherwise subject to public disclosure pursuant to
chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(c) The assessment and collection of the recovery of property tax must
begin within the seven (7) year period beginning the date the assessment
notice reflecting the improperly claimed or approved exemption was re-
quired to be mailed to the taxpayer.
(d)(i) An applicant for an exemption under this section may appeal
to the county board of equalization the county assessor's refusal
to grant an exemption pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor sent notice
of the refusal.
(ii) The taxpayer may appeal to the county board of equalization
the decision by the county assessor to assess the recovery of prop-
erty tax within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor
sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section. The
board may waive the collection of all or part of any costs, late
charges, and interest in order to facilitate the collection of the
recovery of the property tax.
(iii) The taxpayer may appeal the imposition of the penalty pro-
vided in paragraph (a)(iii) of this subsection within thirty (30)
days of the date the county assessor sent the notice to the tax-
payer pursuant to this section.
(e) For purposes of calculating the tax, the amount of the recovered
property tax shall be for each year the exemption allowed by this sec-
tion was improperly claimed or approved, up to a maximum of seven (7)
years. The amount of the recovery of property tax shall be calculated
using the product of the amount of exempted value for each year multi-
plied by the levy for that year plus costs, late charges, and interest
for each year at the rates equal to those provided for delinquent prop-
erty taxes during that year.
(f) Any recovery of property tax shall be due and payable no later than
the date provided for property taxes in section 63-903, Idaho Code, and
if not timely paid, late charges and interest, beginning the first day
of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the
notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section, shall be calculated at
the current rate provided for property taxes.
(g) Recovered property taxes shall be billed, collected and dis-
tributed in the same manner as property taxes, except each taxing dis-
trict or unit shall be notified of the amount of any recovered property
taxes included in any distribution.
(h) Thirty (30) days after the taxpayer is notified, as provided in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall record a notice
of intent to attach a lien. Upon the payment in full of such recov-
ered property taxes prior to the attachment of the lien as provided in
paragraph (i) of this subsection, or upon the successful appeal by the
taxpayer, the county assessor shall record a rescission of the intent to
attach a lien within seven (7) business days of receiving such payment
or within seven (7) business days of the county board of equalization
decision granting the appeal. If the real property is sold to a bona
fide purchaser for value prior to the recording of the notice of the in-


tent to attach a lien, the county assessor and treasurer shall cease the
recovery of such unpaid recovered property tax.
(i) Any unpaid recovered property taxes shall become a lien on the real
property in the same manner as provided for property taxes in section
63-206, Idaho Code, except such lien shall attach as of the first day of
January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the no-
tice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section.
(j) For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho
Code, moneys received pursuant to this subsection as recovery of prop-
erty tax shall be treated as property tax revenue.
(7) The legislature declares that this exemption is necessary and just.
(8) A homestead that previously qualified for exemption under this sec-
tion in the preceding year shall not lose such qualification due to: the
owner's, beneficiary's, partner's, member's or shareholder's absence in the
current year by reason of active military service or because the homestead
has been leased because the owner, beneficiary, partner, member or share-
holder is absent in the current year by reason of active military service.
An owner subject to the provisions of this subsection must apply for the ex-
emption with the county assessor every year on or before a deadline date as
specified by the county assessor for the county in which the homestead is
claimed. If an owner fails to apply on or before the established deadline,
the county may, at its discretion, discontinue the exemption for that year.
(9) A homestead that previously qualified for exemption under this
section in the preceding year shall not lose such qualification due to the
owner's, beneficiary's, partner's, member's or shareholder's death during
the year of the owner's, beneficiary's, partner's, member's or share-
holder's death and the tax year immediately following such death, provided
that the homestead continues to be a part of the owner's, beneficiary's,
partner's, member's or shareholder's estate. After such time, the new owner
shall reapply to receive the exemption pursuant to this section and shall
meet the qualification criteria contained in this section.
(10) The amount by which each exemption approved under this section ex-
ceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may, in the discretion of the
governing board of a taxing district, be deducted from the new construction
roll for the following year prepared by the county assessor in accordance
with section 63-301A, Idaho Code, but only to the extent that the amount ex-
ceeds the same deduction made in the previous year.
(11) By July 1, 2023, the state tax commission shall establish a data-
base of all active exemptions claimed under this section, which database
shall be searchable by a person's name and by the address of the homestead
for which the exemption is claimed. The database shall be made accessible
to officials listed in subsection (6)(b) of this section for the purpose of
verifying that:
(a) Multiple active exemptions have not been claimed by the same per-
son; and
(b) A person's residence for voting purposes is the same as the home-
stead for which such person has an active exemption pursuant to this
section, if an exemption is so claimed.
(12) Increases in taxable value resulting from any change in status of
a property formerly or newly receiving the homeowner exemption shall be in-


cluded by the county assessor on the property roll or subsequent property
roll required pursuant to section 63-301, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-701, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-701. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Claimant" means a person who has filed an application under sec-
tion 63-602G, Idaho Code, and has filed a claim under the provisions of
sections 63-701 through 63-710, Idaho Code. Except as provided in section
63-702(2), Idaho Code, on January 1 or before April 15 of the year in which
the claimant first filed a claim on the homestead in question, a claimant
must be an owner of the homestead, a claimant must have lawful presence in the
United States pursuant to section 67-7903, Idaho Code, and on January 1 of
said year a claimant must be:
(a) Not less than At least sixty-five (65) years old; or
(b) A child under the age of eighteen (18) years who is fatherless or
motherless or who has been abandoned by any surviving parent or parents;
or
(c) A widow or widower; or
(d) A disabled person who is recognized as disabled by the social se-
curity administration pursuant to title 42 of the United States Code,
or by the railroad retirement board pursuant to title 45 of the United
States Code, or by the office of management and budget pursuant to title
5 of the United States Code, or, if a person is not within the purview of,
and is therefore not recognized as disabled by, any other entity listed
in this paragraph, then by the public employee retirement system or pub-
lic employee disability plan in which the person participates that may
be of any state, local unit of government or other jurisdiction in the
United States of America; or
(e) A disabled veteran of any war engaged in by the United States, whose
disability is recognized as a service-connected disability of a degree
of ten percent (10%) or more, or who has a pension for nonservice-con-
nected disabilities, in accordance with laws and regulations adminis-
tered by the United States department of veterans affairs; or
(f) A person, as specified in 42 U.S.C. 1701, who was or is entitled
to receive benefits because he is known to have been taken by a hostile
force as a prisoner, hostage or otherwise; or
(g) Blind.
(2) "Homestead" means the dwelling, owner-occupied by the claimant
as described in this chapter and used as the primary dwelling place of the
claimant and may be occupied by any members of the household as their home,
and so much of the land surrounding it, not exceeding one (1) one-half (1/2)
acre, as is reasonably necessary for the use of the dwelling as a home. It
may consist of a part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and part
of the land upon on which it is built. "Homestead" does not include personal
property such as furniture, furnishings or appliances, but a manufactured
home may be a homestead.
(3) "Household" means the claimant and the claimant's spouse. The term
does not include bona fide lessees, tenants, or roomers and boarders on con-


tract. "Household" includes persons described in subsection (8)(b) of this
section.
(4) "Household income" means all income received by the claimant and,
if married, all income received by the claimant's spouse, in a calendar year.
(5) "Income" means the sum of federal adjusted gross income as defined
in the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 63-3004, Idaho Code, and
to the extent not already included in federal adjusted gross income:
(a) Alimony;
(b) Support money;
(c) Nontaxable strike benefits;
(d) The nontaxable amount of any individual retirement account, pen-
sion or annuity, including railroad retirement benefits, all payments
received under the federal social security act except the social secu-
rity death benefit as specified in this subsection, state unemployment
insurance laws, and veterans disability pensions and compensation, ex-
cluding any return of principal paid by the recipient of an annuity and
excluding rollovers as provided in 26 U.S.C. 402 or 403, and excluding
the nontaxable portion of a Roth individual retirement account distri-
bution, as provided in 26 U.S.C. 408A;
(e) Nontaxable interest received from the federal government or any of
its instrumentalities or a state government or any of its instrumental-
ities;
(f) Worker's compensation; and
(g) The gross amount of loss of earnings insurance.
It does not include gifts from nongovernmental sources or inheritances. To
the extent not reimbursed, the cost of medical care as defined in section
213(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, incurred and paid by the claimant and,
if married, the claimant's spouse, may be deducted from income. To the ex-
tent not reimbursed, personal funeral expenses, including prepaid funeral
expenses and premiums on funeral insurance, of the claimant and claimant's
spouse only, may be deducted from income up to an annual maximum of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per claim. "Income" does not include veterans
disability pensions received by a person described in subsection (1)(e)
of this section who is a claimant or a claimant's spouse if the disability
pension is received pursuant to a service-connected disability of a de-
gree of forty percent (40%) or more. "Income" does not include dependency
and indemnity compensation or death benefits paid to a person described in
subsection (1) of this section by the United States department of veterans
affairs and arising from a service-connected death or disability. "Income"
does not include lump sum death benefits made by the social security admin-
istration pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 402(i). Documentation of medical expenses
may be required by the county assessor and state tax commission in such form
as the county assessor or state tax commission shall determine. For pur-
poses of this chapter only and in the case of a claimant who owns and whose
homestead is a certified family home as defined in section 39-3502, Idaho
Code, "income" does not include payments that the claimant received as an
enrolled medicaid provider from the medical assistance program. "Income"
shall be that received in the calendar year immediately preceding the year
in which a claim is filed. Where a claimant and/or the claimant's spouse
does not file a federal tax return, the claimant's and/or the claimant's


spouse's federal adjusted gross income, for purposes of this section, shall
be an income equivalent to federal adjusted gross income had the claimant
and/or the claimant's spouse filed a federal tax return, as determined by the
county assessor. The county assessor or state tax commission may require
documentation of income in such form as each shall determine, including, but
not limited to: copies of federal or state tax returns and any attachments
thereto; and income reporting forms such as the W-2 and 1099.
For determining income for certain married individuals living apart,
the provisions of sections 2(c) and 7703(b) of the Internal Revenue Code
shall apply.
(6) "Occupied" means actual use and possession.
(7) "Owner" means a person holding title in fee simple or holding a cer-
tificate of motor vehicle title (either of which may be subject to mortgage,
deed of trust or other lien) or who has retained or been granted a life estate
or who is a person entitled to file a claim under section 63-702, Idaho Code.
"Owner" shall also include any person who:
(a) Is the beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust which is the
owner of such homestead and under which the claimant or the claimant's
spouse has the primary right of occupancy of the homestead; or
(b) Is a partner of a limited partnership, member of a limited liabil-
ity company or shareholder of a corporation if such entity holds title
in fee simple or holds a certificate of motor vehicle title and if the
person holds at least a five percent (5%) ownership in such entity, as
determined by the county assessor; or
(c) Has retained or been granted a life estate.
"Owner" includes a vendee in possession under a land sale contract. Any
partial ownership shall be considered as ownership for determining initial
qualification for property tax reduction benefits; however, the amount of
property tax reduction under section 63-704, Idaho Code, and rules promul-
gated pursuant to section 63-705, Idaho Code, shall be computed on the value
of the claimant's partial ownership. "Partial ownership," for the purposes
of this section, means any one (1) person's ownership when property is owned
by more than one (1) person or where the homestead is held by an entity, as
set forth in this subsection, but more than one (1) person has the right of
occupancy of such homestead. A person holding either partial title in fee
simple or holding a certificate of motor vehicle title together with another
person, but who does not occupy the dwelling as his primary dwelling place,
shall not be considered an owner for purposes of this section, if such person
is a cosignatory of a note secured by the dwelling in question and at least
one (1) of the other cosignatories of the note occupies the dwelling as his
primary dwelling place. The combined community property interests of both
spouses shall not be considered partial ownership as long as the combined
community property interests constitute the entire ownership of the home-
stead, including where the spouses are occupying a homestead owned by an en-
tity, as set forth in this subsection, and the spouses have the primary right
of occupancy of the homestead. The proportional reduction required under
this subsection shall not apply to community property interests. Where
title to property was held by a person who has died without timely filing a
claim for property tax reduction, the estate of the deceased person shall be
the "owner," provided that the time periods during which the deceased person


held such title shall be attributed to the estate for the computation of any
time periods under subsection (8)(a) or (b) of this section.
(8)(a) "Primary dwelling place" means the claimant's dwelling place
on January 1 or before April 15 of the year for which the claim is made.
The primary dwelling place is the single place where a claimant has
his true, fixed and permanent home and principal establishment, and to
which whenever the individual is absent he has the intention of return-
ing. A claimant must establish the dwelling to which the claim relates
to be his primary dwelling place by clear and convincing evidence or by
establishing that the dwelling is where the claimant resided on January
1 or before April 15 and:
(i) At least six (6) months during the prior year; or
(ii) The majority of the time the claimant owned the dwelling if
owned by the claimant less than one (1) year; or
(iii) The majority of the time after the claimant first occupied
the dwelling if occupied by the claimant for less than one (1)
year. The county assessor may require written or other proof of
the foregoing in such form as the county assessor may determine.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion, the property upon which the claimant makes application shall be
deemed to be the claimant's primary dwelling place if the claimant is
otherwise qualified and resides in a care facility and does not allow
the property upon which the claimant has made application to be occu-
pied by persons paying a consideration to occupy the dwelling. Payment
of utilities shall not be payment of a consideration to occupy the
dwelling. A claimant's spouse who resides in a care facility shall
be deemed to reside at the claimant's primary dwelling place and to
be a part of the claimant's household. A care facility is a hospital,
nursing facility or intermediate care facility as defined in section
39-1301, Idaho Code, or a facility as defined in section 39-3302, Idaho
Code, or a dwelling other than the one upon which the applicant makes ap-
plication where a claimant who is unable to reside in the dwelling upon
which the application is made lives and receives help in daily living,
protection and security.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-724, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-724. HOMEOWNER PROPERTY TAX RELIEF. (1) It is the intent of the
legislature to provide property tax relief on owner-occupied properties in
Idaho receiving the homestead property tax exemption pursuant to section
63-602G, Idaho Code, as of the second Monday in July each year by providing
state moneys as replacement funding as provided in this section. This sec-
tion does not apply to occupancy taxes levied pursuant to section 63-317,
Idaho Code.
(2) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Eligible property taxes" means all property tax levies on homes
receiving the homestead property tax exemption pursuant to section
63-602G, Idaho Code, as of the second Monday in July each year, ex-
cept for bonds, school district levies, plant facility levies, and any
voter-approved temporary levy for a specific duration. When calculat-


ing the eligible property taxes for the purpose of this section, the
taxable value of each property shall include the value of no more than
one (1) one-half (1/2) acre.
(b) "Homeowner property tax relief homestead" means a property receiv-
ing the homestead property tax exemption pursuant to section 63-602G,
Idaho Code, as of the second Monday in July each year.
(3) There is hereby created in the state treasury the homeowner prop-
erty tax relief account. Moneys in this account shall consist of moneys
transferred from the general fund and are continuously appropriated for
homeowner property tax relief pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(4) The county assessor shall prepare a homeowner property tax relief
roll, which shall be in addition to all other property rolls. By no later
than the first Monday of September each year, the homeowner property tax re-
lief roll shall be certified by the county assessor to the county auditor in
the manner prescribed by rules promulgated by the state tax commission. The
homeowner property tax relief roll shall show:
(a) The name of the taxpayer;
(b) An accurate description of the homeowner property tax relief home-
stead; and
(c) The property's current market value for assessment purposes.
(5)(a) The county auditor shall complete the homeowner property tax re-
lief roll by adding the following information:
(i) The immediate prior year's eligible levy for the tax code area
in which the property is situated;
(ii) The estimated amount of eligible property taxes calculated
by applying the levy in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to the
current year's market value for assessment purposes on each quali-
fying homestead; and
(iii) The total estimated amount of eligible property taxes on
all properties within the county that are receiving the homestead
property tax exemption as of the second Monday in July of the cur-
rent year.
(b) By no later than the second Monday of September each year, the
county auditor shall certify the completed homeowner property tax re-
lief roll to the state tax commission in the manner prescribed by rules
promulgated by the state tax commission.
(6) The state tax commission shall determine the total number of home-
owner property tax relief homesteads to be allowed in each county, the
dollar amount of eligible property taxes for each homeowner property tax
relief homestead allowed, and the total dollar amount of eligible property
taxes for all homeowner property tax relief homesteads within each county
from the amounts certified on the homeowner property tax relief roll. Such
amounts shall be summed for all eligible property tax relief homesteads in
all counties to determine the total amount of estimated eligible property
taxes. This sum shall be divided into the amount of moneys in the homeowner
property tax relief account as of August 1 of each year. The result shall
be multiplied by the total amount of estimated eligible property taxes on
such homesteads in each county. This amount shall be certified to the county
auditor and tax collector by the state tax commission no later than the third
Monday in September. By no later than December 20 of each year, the state


tax commission shall pay to the county tax collector of each county the first
half of the amount due to each county as reimbursement for homeowner property
tax relief as provided in this section and shall pay the second half of such
amount by no later than June 20 of the following year.
(7) The state tax commission may audit each and every property on the
homeowner property tax relief roll. If the state tax commission determines
that a homeowner property tax relief homestead credit is erroneous, the
state tax commission shall disapprove as much of the credit as necessary in
order to conform with statutory standards. The state tax commission shall
provide the homeowner written notice of the state tax commission's intent
to disapprove all or a portion of the credit. The homeowner shall have
twenty-eight (28) days to make written protest to the state tax commission
of the intended action. The homeowner may submit additional information and
may request an informal hearing with the state tax commission. If the home-
owner fails to make written protest within twenty-eight (28) days, the state
tax commission shall provide written notice of disapproval to both the home-
owner and the county auditor of the county in which the property is situated
by December 20. Any homeowner whose claim is disapproved in whole or in part
by the state tax commission may appeal such disapproval to the board of tax
appeals or to the district court of the county of residence of the taxpayer
within thirty (30) days.
(8) Each county treasurer shall apply the moneys received pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section to the eligible property taxes levied on the
properties listed on the certified homeowner property tax relief roll that
year. The moneys shall be designated as a line item credit against the to-
tal of all eligible property taxes on the property tax bill for each property
receiving the tax relief provided by this section. Such moneys shall be dis-
tributed in the same manner as property tax revenues.
(9) The amount of property tax relief for a homeowner's property taxes
shall be applied after the homestead exemption pursuant to section 63-602G,
Idaho Code, has been applied. The property tax relief amount cannot exceed
the actual amount of current eligible property taxes due on the homeowner's
property tax notice. No delinquent property taxes, penalties, interest, or
fines may be paid with moneys from this program.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prevent a homeowner from applying
for or receiving any other property tax relief provided pursuant to this
chapter. The property tax relief provided pursuant to this section shall be
credited to the homeowner's property tax bill before any other property tax
relief is applied, up to a maximum of the actual property taxes due on the
homeowner property tax relief homestead.
(11) Any amount of homeowner property tax relief moneys distributed by
the state tax commission to a county that exceeds the total amount of all el-
igible property taxes due from all homeowner property tax relief homesteads
in the county shall revert to the state general fund. The county treasurer
shall deposit such moneys with the state treasurer by the fourth Monday in
July each year for the preceding property tax year.
(12) Within three (3) years of payment, the state tax commission may re-
cover any erroneous or incorrect payment made to any homeowner receiving re-
lief under this section. The deficiency determination, collection, and en-
forcement procedures provided in chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, shall ap-


ply and be available to the state tax commission for enforcement and collec-
tion under this section. Wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined
as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement
or collection under this section, be described as tax relief liens and pro-
ceedings. In connection with this section, a deficiency shall consist of any
amount erroneously paid on behalf of a homeowner under this section.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 7, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-725, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-725. HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX REPLACEMENT FUND. (1) It is the intent
of the legislature to replace the property tax revenue lost by taxing dis-
tricts as a result of the expansion of the homestead property tax exemption
pursuant to section 63-602G, Idaho Code, with distributions from increased
revenue collected from sales and use taxes.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible homesteads" means properties receiving the homestead
property tax exemption pursuant to section 63-602G, Idaho Code, as of
the second Monday in July each year.
(b) "Estimated lost property tax revenue" means the amount of property
taxes that would have been collected from eligible homesteads in each
taxing district absent the homestead exemption provided in section
63-602G, Idaho Code, as determined from the certified homestead prop-
erty tax relief roll under section 63-724, Idaho Code.
(3) There is hereby created in the state treasury the homestead prop-
erty tax replacement fund. Moneys in the fund shall consist of distributions
of sales and use tax revenues pursuant to section 63-3638, Idaho Code, and
are continuously appropriated for distribution to taxing districts as pro-
vided in this section.
(4) Moneys in the homestead property tax replacement fund shall be dis-
tributed to taxing districts as follows:
(a) Each county assessor shall provide the certified homestead prop-
erty tax relief roll to the county auditor in the same manner as provided
in section 63-724, Idaho Code.
(b) Each county auditor shall calculate the estimated lost property tax
revenue for each taxing district in the county based on the homestead
roll provided in section 63-724, Idaho Code, and shall certify such
amounts to the state tax commission by no later than the second Monday of
September each year.
(c) The state tax commission shall determine the statewide total of es-
timated lost property tax revenue by summing the certified amounts for
all taxing districts in all counties. The state tax commission shall
divide the amount of moneys in the homestead property tax replacement
fund as of August 1 each year by such statewide total to determine a pro-
ration factor. The state tax commission shall multiply the proration
factor by each taxing district's certified estimated lost property tax
revenue to determine the total annual amount payable to each taxing dis-
trict. The state tax commission shall certify each taxing district's
prorated amount no later than the third Monday in September each year.


(d) By no later than December 20 of each year, the state tax commission
shall pay to the county tax collector of each county one-half (1/2) of
the total annual amount determined for all taxing districts within that
county and shall pay the remaining one-half (1/2) by no later than June
20 of the following year.
(e) Within seven (7) days of receipt of moneys pursuant to paragraph (d)
of this subsection, the county treasurer shall distribute to each tax-
ing district within the county its proportionate share as determined by
the state tax commission.
(f) Funds distributed under this section shall be treated as property
tax revenues for purposes of the budget limitations in section 63-802,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 63-3619, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3619. IMPOSITION AND RATE OF THE SALES TAX. An excise tax is hereby
imposed upon on each sale at retail at the rate of six percent (6%) eight per-
cent (8%) of the sales price of all retail sales subject to taxation under
this chapter, and such amount shall be computed monthly on all sales at re-
tail within the preceding month.
(a) The tax shall apply to, be computed on, and collected for all
credit, installment, conditional or similar sales at the time of the sale or,
in the case of rentals, at the time the rental is charged.
(b) The tax hereby imposed shall be collected by the retailer from the
consumer.
(c) The state tax commission shall provide schedules for collection of
the tax on sales which that involve a fraction of a dollar. The retailer
shall calculate the tax upon on the entire amount of the purchases of the con-
sumer made at a particular time and not separately upon each item purchased.
The retailer may retain any amount collected under the bracket system pre-
scribed which that is in excess of the amount of tax for which he is liable
to the state during the period as compensation for the work of collecting the
tax.
(d) It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise or hold out or state to
the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or any
part thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer or that it will not
be added to the selling price of the property sold or that, if added, it or any
part thereof will be refunded. Any person violating any provision of this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(e) The state tax commission may by rule provide that the amount col-
lected by the retailer from the customer in reimbursement of the tax be dis-
played separately from the list price, the price advertised on the premises,
the marked price, or other price on the sales slip or other proof of sale.
(f) The taxes imposed by this chapter shall apply to the sales to con-
tractors purchasing for use in the performance of contracts with the United
States.
SECTION 6. That Section 63-3621, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


63-3621. IMPOSITION AND RATE OF THE USE TAX -- EXEMPTIONS. (1) An ex-
cise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this
state of tangible personal property acquired on or after October 1, 2006, for
storage, use, or other consumption in this state at the rate of six percent
(6%) eight percent (8%) of the value of the property, and a recent sales price
shall be presumptive evidence of the value of the property unless the prop-
erty is wireless telecommunications equipment, in which case a recent sales
price shall be conclusive evidence of the value of the property.
(2) Every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming, in this state,
tangible personal property is liable for the tax. His liability is not ex-
tinguished until the tax has been paid to this state, except that a receipt
from a retailer maintaining a place of business in this state or engaged in
business in this state given to the purchaser is sufficient to relieve the
purchaser from further liability for the tax to which the receipt refers.
A retailer shall not be considered to have stored, used, or consumed wire-
less telecommunications equipment by virtue of giving, selling, or other-
wise transferring such equipment at a discount as an inducement to a consumer
to commence or continue a contract for telecommunications service.
(3) Every retailer engaged in business in this state and making sales
of tangible personal property for the storage, use, or other consumption in
this state, not exempted under section 63-3622, Idaho Code, shall, at the
time of making the sales or, if storage, use, or other consumption of the tan-
gible personal property is not then taxable hereunder, at the time the stor-
age, use, or other consumption becomes taxable, collect the tax from the pur-
chaser and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form
prescribed by the state tax commission.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply when the retailer
pays sales tax on the transaction and collects reimbursement for such sales
tax from the customer.
(5) Every retailer engaged in business in this state or maintaining a
place of business in this state shall register with the state tax commission
and give the name and address of all agents operating in this state the loca-
tion of all distributions or sales houses or offices or other places of busi-
ness in this state and such other information as the state tax commission may
require.
(6) For the purpose of the proper administration of this act and to
prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it shall
be presumed that tangible personal property sold by any person for delivery
in this state is sold for storage, use, or other consumption in this state.
The burden of proving the sale is tax-exempt is on the person who makes the
sale, unless he obtains from the purchaser a resale certificate to the effect
that the property is purchased for resale or rental. It shall be presumed
that sales made to a person who has completed a resale certificate for the
seller's records are not taxable and the seller need not collect sales or
use taxes unless the tangible personal property purchased is taxable to the
purchaser as a matter of law in the particular instance claimed on the resale
certificate.
(a) A seller may accept a resale certificate from a purchaser prior to
the time of sale, at the time of sale, or at any reasonable time after the
sale when necessary to establish the privilege of the exemption. The


resale certificate relieves the person selling the property from the
burden of proof only if taken from a person who is engaged in the busi-
ness of selling or renting tangible personal property and who holds the
permit provided for by section 63-3620, Idaho Code, or who is a retailer
not engaged in business in this state and who, at the time of purchasing
the tangible personal property, intends to sell or rent it in the regu-
lar course of business or is unable to ascertain at the time of purchase
whether the property will be sold or used for some other purpose. Other
than as provided elsewhere in this section, when a resale certificate,
properly executed, is presented to the seller, the seller has no duty or
obligation to collect sales or use taxes in regard to any sales trans-
action so documented, regardless of whether the purchaser properly or
improperly claimed an exemption. A seller so relieved of the obligation
to collect tax is also relieved of any liability to the purchaser for
failure to collect tax or for making any report or disclosure of infor-
mation required or permitted under this chapter.
(b) The resale certificate shall bear the name and address of the pur-
chaser, shall be signed by the purchaser or his agent, shall indicate
the number of the permit issued to the purchaser or that the purchaser
is an out-of-state retailer, and shall indicate the general character
of the tangible personal property sold by the purchaser in the regular
course of business. The certificate shall be substantially in such form
as the state tax commission may prescribe.
(c) If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate makes any storage or
use of the property other than retention, demonstration, or display
while holding it for sale in the regular course of business, the storage
or use is taxable as of the time the property is first so stored or used.
(7) Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not in excess of one hundred dollars
($100), and each violation shall constitute a separate offense.
(8) It shall be presumed that tangible personal property shipped or
brought to this state by the purchaser was purchased from a retailer for
storage, use, or other consumption in this state.
(9) It shall be presumed that tangible personal property delivered out-
side this state to a purchaser known by the retailer to be a resident of this
state was purchased from a retailer for storage, use, or other consumption in
this state. This presumption may be controverted by evidence satisfactory
to the state tax commission that the property was not purchased for storage,
use, or other consumption in this state.
(10) When the tangible personal property subject to use tax has been
subjected to a general retail sales or use tax by another state of the United
States in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of the Idaho tax, and
evidence can be given of such payment, the property will not be subject to
Idaho use tax. If the amount paid to the other state was less, the property
will be subject to use tax to the extent that the Idaho tax exceeds the tax
paid to the other state. For the purposes of this subsection, a registration
certificate or title issued by another state or subdivision thereof for a ve-
hicle or trailer or a vessel as defined in section 67-7003, Idaho Code, shall
be sufficient evidence of payment of a general retail sales or use tax.


(11) The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to the use by a
nonresident of this state of a motor vehicle registered or licensed under the
laws of the state of his residence and not used in this state more than a cu-
mulative period of time totaling ninety (90) days in any consecutive twelve
(12) months and if none of the buyers listed on the purchase, registration,
or title documents are Idaho residents. A nonresident business entity will
be held to the same requirements as a nonresident individual to qualify for
the exemption provided in this subsection, except that the nonresident busi-
ness entity also must not be formed under the laws of the state of Idaho. The
use tax herein shall also not apply to any use of a motor vehicle registered
or licensed under the laws of the state of residence of a nonresident stu-
dent while such nonresident student is enrolled as a full-time student in an
institution of postsecondary education that is both physically located in
Idaho and recognized as accredited by the state board of education.
(12) The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to the use of
household goods, personal effects, and personally owned vehicles or per-
sonally owned aircraft by a resident of this state if such articles were
acquired by such person in another state while a resident of that state and
primarily for use outside this state and if such use was actual and substan-
tial; however, if an article was acquired less than ninety (90) days prior
to the time he entered this state, it will be presumed that the article was
acquired for use in this state and that its use outside this state was not ac-
tual and substantial. The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to
the use of household goods, personal effects, and personally owned vehicles
or personally owned aircraft by active duty military personnel temporarily
assigned in this state and spouses who accompany them if such articles were
acquired prior to receipt of orders to transfer to Idaho or ninety (90) days
prior to moving to Idaho, whichever time period is shorter. For purposes
of this subsection, "resident" shall be as defined in section 63-3013 or
63-3013A, Idaho Code. For purposes of this subsection, wherever the term
"individual" appears in section 63-3013 or 63-3013A, Idaho Code, the term
includes a natural person or a grantor trust as described in sections 673
through 678 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(13)(a) The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to the stor-
age, use, or other consumption of tangible personal property that is or
will be incorporated into real property and has been donated to and has
become the property of:
(i) A nonprofit organization as defined in section 63-3622O,
Idaho Code;
(ii) The state of Idaho; or
(iii) Any political subdivision of the state.
(b) This exemption applies whether the tangible personal property is
incorporated in real property by the donee, a contractor, a subcontrac-
tor of the donee, or any other person.
(14) The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to tastings of
food and beverages, including but not limited to wine and beer. For the pur-
poses of this subsection, a tasting of wine and beer shall be defined as the
maximum serving allowed by state or federal laws for such occasions provided
to a potential customer, at no charge, at a location where like or similar


beverages are sold. For nonalcoholic beverages and food, a tasting shall be
defined as a sample from a unit available for sale at the tasting location.
(15) The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to donations
of food or beverages, or both, to individuals or nonprofit organizations.
For the purposes of this section, "nonprofit organization" means those non-
profit entities currently registered with the secretary of state pursuant to
section 30-30-102, Idaho Code.
(16) The use tax imposed by this section shall not apply to a retailer
supplying prepared food or beverages free of charge to its employee when that
retailer sells prepared food or beverages in its normal course of business.
SECTION 7. That Section 63-3638, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3638. SALES TAX -- DISTRIBUTION. All moneys collected under this
chapter, except as may otherwise be required in sections 63-3203, 63-3620F,
and 63-3709, Idaho Code, shall be distributed by the state tax commission as
follows:
(1)(a) An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund ac-
count sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized
under this chapter by the state tax commission shall be paid through the
state refund account, and those moneys are continuously appropriated.
(b) Following the distribution required by paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, an amount equal to twenty-one and seventy-five hundredths
percent (21.75%) of the revenues collected under this chapter shall be
distributed to the homestead property tax replacement fund, to be dis-
tributed to taxing districts as provided in section 63-725, Idaho Code.
(c) Following the distribution required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection, an amount equal to three and twenty-five hundredths per-
cent (3.25%) of the revenues collected under this chapter shall be
distributed to the budget stabilization fund established in section
57-814, Idaho Code. The distributions required by this paragraph shall
be made after the distributions required by paragraph (a) of this sub-
section and prior to any other distributions required by this section.
(d) Following the distribution required by paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, the distributions required by paragraphs (b) and (c) of this
subsection shall be made prior to any other distributions required by
this section, and all percentage-based distributions provided for in
this section shall be calculated on the remaining revenues collected
under this chapter after the distributions required by paragraphs (a),
(b), and (c) of this subsection.
(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) per year is continuously appro-
priated and shall be distributed to the permanent building fund, provided by
section 57-1108, Idaho Code.
(3) Four million eight hundred thousand dollars ($4,800,000) per year
is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the water pollution
control fund established by section 39-3628, Idaho Code.
(4) An amount equal to the sum required to be certified by the chair-
man of the Idaho housing and finance association to the state tax commis-
sion pursuant to section 67-6211, Idaho Code, in each year is continuously
appropriated and shall be paid to any capital reserve fund established by


the Idaho housing and finance association pursuant to section 67-6211, Idaho
Code. Such amounts, if any, as may be appropriated hereunder to the capital
reserve fund of the Idaho housing and finance association shall be repaid for
distribution under the provisions of this section, subject to the provisions
of section 67-6215, Idaho Code, by the Idaho housing and finance associa-
tion, as soon as possible, from any moneys available therefor and in excess
of the amounts the association determines will keep it self-supporting.
(5) An amount equal to the sum required by the provisions of sections
63-709 and 63-717, Idaho Code, after allowance for the amount appropriated
by section 63-718(3), Idaho Code, is continuously appropriated and shall be
paid as provided by sections 63-709 and 63-717, Idaho Code.
(6) An amount required by the provisions of chapter 53, title 33, Idaho
Code.
(7) An amount required by the provisions of chapter 87, title 67, Idaho
Code.
(8) For fiscal year 2011 and each fiscal year thereafter, four million
one hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000), of which two million two hundred
thousand dollars ($2,200,000) shall be distributed to each of the forty-four
(44) counties in equal amounts and one million nine hundred thousand dol-
lars ($1,900,000) shall be distributed to the forty-four (44) counties in
the proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of
the state. For fiscal year 2012 and for each fiscal year thereafter, the
amount distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be adjusted annually
by the state tax commission in accordance with the consumer price index for
all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. department of labor,
bureau of labor statistics, but in no fiscal year shall the total amount
allocated for counties under this subsection be less than four million one
hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000). Any increase resulting from the ad-
justment required in this section shall be distributed to each county in the
proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of the
state. Each county shall establish a special election fund to which shall
be deposited all revenues received from the distribution pursuant to this
subsection. All such revenues shall be used exclusively to defray the costs
associated with conducting elections as required of county clerks by the
provisions of section 34-1401, Idaho Code.
(9) One dollar ($1.00) on each application for certificate of title
or initial application for registration of a motor vehicle, snowmobile,
all-terrain vehicle or other vehicle processed by the county assessor or the
Idaho transportation department, excepting those applications in which any
sales or use taxes due have been previously collected by a retailer, shall be
a fee for the services of the assessor of the county or the Idaho transporta-
tion department in collecting such taxes and shall be paid into the current
expense fund of the county or state highway account established in section
40-702, Idaho Code.
(10) Eleven and five-tenths percent (11.5%) of revenues collected un-
der this chapter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3203,
63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsection (1) of this section, is
continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the revenue-sharing
account, which is hereby created in the state treasury, and the moneys in the


revenue-sharing account will be paid in installments each calendar quarter
by the state tax commission as follows:
(a) Forty-five and two-tenths percent (45.2%) shall be paid to the var-
ious cities as follows:
(i) The revenue-sharing amount calculated by the state tax com-
mission for the various cities for each quarter of fiscal year 2020
shall be the base amount for current quarterly revenue distribu-
tion amounts. The state tax commission shall calculate the per
capita distribution for each city resulting from the previous fis-
cal year's distributions.
(ii) If there is no change in the amount of the revenue-sharing
account from the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then the
various cities shall receive the same amount received for the same
quarter of the previous fiscal year.
(iii) If the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the cur-
rent quarter is greater than the balance of the revenue-sharing
account for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then:
1. If the distributions made to the cities during the same
quarter of the previous fiscal year were below the base
amount established in fiscal year 2020, then the various
cities shall first receive a proportional increase up to the
base amount for each city and up to a one-percent (1%) in-
crease over such base amount. Any remaining moneys shall be
distributed to cities with a below-average per capita dis-
tribution in the proportion that the population of that city
bears to the population of all cities with below-average per
capita distributions within the state.
2. If the distributions made to the cities during the same
quarter of the previous fiscal year were at or above the
base amount established in fiscal year 2020, then the cities
shall receive the same distribution they received during the
same quarter of the previous fiscal year plus a proportional
increase up to one percent (1%). Any remaining moneys shall
be distributed to the cities with a below-average per capita
distribution in the proportion that the population of that
city bears to the population of all cities with a below-aver-
age per capita distribution within the state.
(iv) If the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the cur-
rent quarter is less than the balance of the revenue-sharing ac-
count for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then the
cities shall first receive a proportional reduction down to the
base amount established in fiscal year 2020. If further reduc-
tions are necessary, the cities shall receive reductions based on
the proportion that each city's population bears to the population
of all cities within the state.
(b) Forty-seven and one-tenth percent (47.1%) shall be paid to the var-
ious counties as follows:
(i) Fifty-nine and eight-tenths percent (59.8%) of the amount to
be distributed under this paragraph (b) of this subsection shall
be distributed as follows:


1. One million three hundred twenty thousand dollars
($1,320,000) annually shall be distributed one forty-fourth
(1/44) to each of the various counties; and
2. The balance of such amount shall be paid to the various
counties, and each county shall be entitled to an amount in
the proportion that the population of that county bears to
the population of the state; and
(ii) Forty and two-tenths percent (40.2%) of the amount to be dis-
tributed under this paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be dis-
tributed as follows:
1. Each county that received a payment under the provisions
of section 63-3638(e), Idaho Code, as that subsection ex-
isted immediately prior to July 1, 2000, during the fourth
quarter of calendar year 1999, shall be entitled to a like
amount during succeeding calendar quarters.
2. If the dollar amount of money available under this sub-
section (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter does not equal the amount
paid in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each
county's payment shall be reduced proportionately.
3. If the dollar amount of money available under this sub-
section (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter exceeds the amount paid
in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each county
shall be entitled to a proportionately increased payment,
but such increase shall not exceed one hundred five percent
(105%) of the total payment made in the fourth quarter of
calendar year 1999.
4. If the dollar amount of money available under this sub-
section (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter exceeds one hundred five
percent (105%) of the total payment made in the fourth quar-
ter of calendar year 1999, any amount over and above such
one hundred five percent (105%) shall be paid to the various
counties in the proportion that the population of the county
bears to the population of the state; and
(c) Seven and seven-tenths percent (7.7%) of the amount appropriated in
this subsection shall be paid to the several counties for distribution
to special purpose taxing districts as follows:
(i) Each such district that received a payment under the provi-
sions of section 63-3638(e), Idaho Code, as such subsection ex-
isted immediately prior to July 1, 2000, during the fourth quarter
of calendar year 1999, shall be entitled to a like amount during
succeeding calendar quarters.
(ii) If the dollar amount of money available under this subsec-
tion (10)(c) in any quarter does not equal the amount paid in the
fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each special purpose taxing
district's payment shall be reduced proportionately.
(iii) If the dollar amount of money available under this subsec-
tion (10)(c) in any quarter exceeds the amount distributed under
paragraph (c)(i) of this subsection, each special purpose taxing
district shall be entitled to a share of the excess based on the
proportion each such district's current property tax budget bears


to the sum of the current property tax budgets of all such dis-
tricts in the state. Each year, starting with the distribution
for the quarter ending December 31, the state tax commission shall
calculate this distribution based on the district's current prop-
erty tax budgets, including any unrecovered forgone amounts as de-
termined under section 63-802(1)(e), Idaho Code. When a special
purpose taxing district is situated in more than one (1) county,
the state tax commission shall determine the portion attributable
to the special purpose taxing district from each county in which it
is situated.
(iv) If special purpose taxing districts are consolidated, the
resulting district is entitled to a base amount equal to the sum of
the base amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each dis-
trict prior to the consolidation.
(v) If a special purpose taxing district is dissolved or disin-
corporated, the state tax commission shall continuously distrib-
ute to the board of county commissioners an amount equal to the
last quarter's distribution prior to dissolution or disincorpora-
tion. The board of county commissioners shall determine any re-
distribution of moneys so received.
(vi) Taxing districts formed after January 1, 2001, are not en-
titled to a payment under the provisions of this paragraph (c) of
this subsection.
(vii) For purposes of this paragraph (c) of this subsection, a spe-
cial purpose taxing district is any taxing district that is not a
city, a county, or a school district.
(viii) Special purpose taxing districts shall use funds received
under the provisions of this subsection only for the purposes for
which the special purpose taxing districts were formed.
(11) Amounts calculated in accordance with section 2, chapter 356, laws
of 2001, for annual distribution to counties and other taxing districts be-
ginning in October 2001 for replacement of property tax on farm machinery and
equipment exempted pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code. For nonschool
districts, the state tax commission shall distribute one-fourth (1/4) of
this amount certified quarterly to each county. For school districts, the
state tax commission shall distribute one-fourth (1/4) of the amount cer-
tified quarterly to each school district. For nonschool districts, the
county auditor shall distribute such amounts to each district within thirty
(30) calendar days from receipt of moneys from the state tax commission.
Moneys received by each taxing district for replacement shall be utilized
in the same manner and in the same proportions as revenues from property
taxation. The moneys remitted to the county treasurer for replacement of
property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, may
be considered by the counties and other taxing districts and budgeted at the
same time, in the same manner, and in the same year as revenues from taxation
on personal property, which these moneys replace. If taxing districts are
consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal to the
sum of the amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each district
pursuant to this subsection prior to the consolidation. If a taxing district
is dissolved or disincorporated, the state tax commission shall continu-


ously distribute to the board of county commissioners an amount equal to the
last quarter's distribution prior to dissolution or disincorporation. The
board of county commissioners shall determine any redistribution of moneys
so received. If a taxing district annexes territory, the distribution of
moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be unaffected. Taxing
districts formed after January 1, 2001, are not entitled to a payment under
the provisions of this subsection. School districts shall receive an amount
determined by multiplying the sum of the year 2000 school district levy mi-
nus .004 times the market value on December 31, 2000, in the district of the
property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, pro-
vided that the result of these calculations shall not be less than zero (0).
The result of these school district calculations shall be further increased
by six percent (6%). For purposes of the limitation provided by section
63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this section as property tax
replacement for property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE,
Idaho Code, shall be treated as property tax revenues.
(12) Amounts necessary to pay refunds as provided in section 63-3641,
Idaho Code, to a developer of a retail complex shall be remitted to the demon-
stration pilot project fund created in section 63-3641, Idaho Code.
(13) Amounts calculated in accordance with section 63-602KK(4), Idaho
Code, for annual distribution to counties and other taxing districts for
replacement of property tax on personal property tax exemptions pursuant
to section 63-602KK(2), Idaho Code, which amounts are continuously ap-
propriated unless the legislature enacts a different appropriation for a
particular fiscal year. For purposes of the limitation provided by section
63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this section as property tax
replacement for property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602KK,
Idaho Code, shall be treated as property tax revenues. If taxing districts
are consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal to
the sum of the amounts that were received in the last calendar year by each
district pursuant to this subsection prior to the consolidation. If a taxing
district or revenue allocation area annexes territory, the distribution of
moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be unaffected. Taxing
districts and revenue allocation areas formed after January 1, 2022, are not
entitled to a payment under the provisions of this subsection.
(14) For fiscal year 2023 only, a sum of thirty-four million dollars
($34,000,000) shall be distributed each year by the state tax commission to
the forty-four (44) counties in the proportion that the expenditures of each
county for indigent defense services during county fiscal year 2021, exclud-
ing any state funding or grants, bear to the expenditures of all counties
in the state for indigent defense services during county fiscal year 2021,
excluding any state funding or grants. No later than July 1, 2022, the state
public defense commission shall certify to the state tax commission each
county's proportionate share of all counties' indigent defense expenses in
county fiscal year 2021, excluding any state funding or grants.
(15) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, two and
twenty-five hundredths percent (2.25%) of revenues collected under this
chapter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3203,
63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1), (10), and (16)
of this section, is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed an-


nually to the homeowner property tax relief account established in section
63-724, Idaho Code.
(16)(a) Prior to July 1, 2025, four and five-tenths percent (4.5%) of
revenues collected under this chapter, following any distributions re-
quired by sections 63-3620F and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections
(1) and (10) of this section, but no less than eighty million dol-
lars ($80,000,000) and no more than one hundred forty million dollars
($140,000,000), shall be distributed as follows:
(i) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) is continuously appro-
priated and shall be distributed to the transportation expansion
and congestion mitigation fund established in section 40-720,
Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining moneys in excess of eighty million dollars
($80,000,000) provided for in this subsection is continuously ap-
propriated and shall be apportioned to local units of government
for local highway projects in the same percentages provided for in
section 40-709(1) through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of govern-
ment may pool funds allocated to them pursuant to this paragraph
for local highway projects.
(b) From July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, one hundred forty-five
million dollars ($145,000,000) of revenues collected under this chap-
ter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3620F and
63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1) and (10) of this section
shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is continuously
appropriated and shall be distributed first to the transportation
expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in section
40-720, Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) pro-
vided for in this paragraph is continuously appropriated and shall
be apportioned to local units of government for local highway
projects in the same percentages provided for in section 40-709(1)
through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of government may pool funds
allocated to them pursuant to this subparagraph for local highway
projects.
(c) From July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, one hundred sixty-five
million dollars ($165,000,000) of revenues collected under this chap-
ter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3620F and
63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1) and (10) of this section
shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) is contin-
uously appropriated and shall be distributed first to the trans-
portation expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in
section 40-720, Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) pro-
vided for in this paragraph is continuously appropriated and shall
be apportioned to local units of government for local highway
projects in the same percentages provided for in section 40-709(1)
through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of government may pool funds


allocated to them pursuant to this subparagraph for local highway
projects.
(d) Commencing July 1, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter, one
hundred eighty-five million dollars ($185,000,000) of revenues col-
lected under this chapter, following any distributions required by
sections 63-3620F and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1) and
(10) of this section shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) is contin-
uously appropriated and shall be distributed first to the trans-
portation expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in
section 40-720, Idaho Code; and
(ii) The remaining forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) pro-
vided for in this paragraph is continuously appropriated and shall
be apportioned to local units of government for local highway
projects in the same percentages provided for in section 40-709(1)
through (3), Idaho Code. Local units of government may pool funds
allocated to them pursuant to this subparagraph for local highway
projects.
(17) Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter,
three hundred thirty million dollars ($330,000,000) shall be distributed
annually to the general fund specifically for the public schools educa-
tional support program, and eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) shall be
distributed annually to the in-demand careers fund established in section
72-1206, Idaho Code. The state tax commission shall make such transfers in
quarterly installments.
(18) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, three
and twenty-five hundredths percent (3.25%) of revenues collected under
this chapter, following any distributions required by sections 63-3203,
63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1), (10), and (16) of
this section, is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed annu-
ally to the school district facilities fund established pursuant to section
33-911, Idaho Code.
(19) One hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) collected
under this chapter, following any distributions required by sections
63-3620F and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and by subsections (1), (10), (15), (16),
and (18) of this section is continuously appropriated and shall be dis-
tributed to the school modernization facilities fund established in section
33-912, Idaho Code. The state tax commission shall make such transfers in
quarterly installments.
(20) Any moneys remaining over and above those necessary to meet and
reserve for payments under other subsections of this section shall be dis-
tributed to the general fund.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be in full force
and effect on and after passage and approval and retroactively to January 1,
2026, and Sections 4 through 7 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after July 1, 2026.